Wyoming, session 2025, SF0187.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-3-412(a) and 9-3-413 are amended to
read:

9-3-412. Members' contributions; payroll deductions;
employer authorized to pay employee's share.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and
W.S. 9-3-431 and 9-3-432, every member covered under this
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774
article shall pay into the account nine and one-quarter
percent (9.25%) of his salary for the period from July 1,
2021 through June 30, 2026 2025, nine and one-half percent
(9.50%) of his salary for the period from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026 and thereafter a percentage of the
member's salary determined in accordance with W.S.
9-3-413.1. Every firefighter member covered under this
article shall pay into the account seven percent (7%) of
his salary. Payments shall be deducted each pay period
from each member's salary by the chief fiscal officer of
each participating employer. Employee contributions shall
be transferred to the account in accordance with subsection
(c) of this section.

9-3-413. Employer's contributions; payable monthly;
transfer to account; interest imposed upon delinquent
contributions; recovery.

Except as provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV),
9-3-431 and 9-3-432, each employer, excluding employers of
firefighter members, shall, on a monthly basis, pay into
the account a contribution equal to nine and thirty-seven
hundredths percent (9.37%) of the salary paid to each of
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774
its members covered under this article for the period from
July 1, 2021 through June 30, 2026 2025, nine and sixty-two
hundredths percent (9.62%) of the salary paid for the
period from July 1, 2025 through June 30, 2026 and
thereafter a percentage of the salary paid as determined in
accordance with W.S. 9-3-413.1. Employers of firefighter
members shall pay into the account a contribution equal to
seven and twelve hundredths percent (7.12%) of the salary
paid. Employer contributions for any month, together with
the members' contributions for that month, if any, shall be
transferred to the board not later than the twelfth day of
the following month. These contributions shall be credited
to the account in a manner as directed by the board. Any
employer failing to transfer contributions under this
section in sufficient time for the board to receive the
contributions by the twenty-fifth day of the month due
shall be assessed interest at the assumed rate of return as
determined by the board, compounded annually. Interest
imposed under this section shall be payable not later than
the twelfth day of the next succeeding month. If the
contributions and any interest imposed under this section
are not transferred to the board when due, they may be
recovered, together with court costs, in an action brought
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774
for that purpose in the first judicial district court in
Laramie County, Wyoming.

Section 2.

(a) As used in this section, "state agency" includes
each state executive, legislative or judicial department,
board, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the
state and, for purposes of subsections (d) and (k) of this
section, includes the University of Wyoming and each
community college.

(b) There is appropriated one million seven hundred
forty-one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,741,500.00)
from the general fund to the state auditor for purposes of
payment of the increase in employer contribution rates
required by W.S. 9-3-413, as amended by section 1 of this
act. Subject to the provisions of this section and from
this appropriation, the state auditor shall distribute this
appropriation as follows:

(i) Sixteen thousand five hundred dollars
($16,500.00) for legislative branch employer contributions;
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774

(ii) Sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000.00)
for judicial branch employer contributions;

(iii) Nine hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($975,000.00) for state executive branch employer
contributions;

(iv) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) for community college employer contributions;

(v) Four hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($435,000.00) for University of Wyoming employer
contributions.

(c) There is appropriated to the state auditor three
million four hundred twelve thousand five hundred dollars
($3,412,500.00) from the public school foundation program
account for employer contributions for school districts.

(d) For state agency employers whose retirement
contributions are made from non-general fund sources, there
is appropriated from those accounts and funds amounts
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774
necessary to provide payment of the increase in employer
contribution rates required by W.S. 9-3-413, as amended by
section 1 of this act.

(e) The appropriations under paragraphs (b)(i)
through (iii) and subsection (d) of this section shall only
be expended to provide payment of the increase in each
state agency's employer contribution rates required by W.S.
9-3-413, as amended by section 1 of this act, for fiscal
year 2026. The appropriation under paragraphs (b)(iv) and
(v) of this section shall only be expended for the purpose
of providing payment of the increase in the University of
Wyoming and community college employer contribution rates
required by W.S. 9-3-413, as amended by section 1 of this
act, and to provide like contributions under W.S. 21-19-101
through 21-19-106 corresponding to the increased employer
contributions under this act for fiscal year 2026.

(f) The appropriation under subsection (c) of this
section shall only be expended for the purpose of providing
each school district's increased employer contribution
required by W.S. 9-3-413, as amended by section 1 of this
act, for fiscal year 2026. The state auditor shall transfer
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774
the funds to the state retirement system or to the
department of education for distribution to individual
school districts as determined by the department of
education to be necessary to meet the provisions of this
act. Any unexpended public school foundation program
account funds appropriated under subsection (c) of this
section on June 30, 2026 shall revert to the public school
foundation program account.

(g) No amount of the appropriations made in this
section shall be used to provide the increased employee
contribution required by this act.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
appropriations under this section shall not be transferred
or expended for any purpose other than as specified in this
section. Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from
the appropriations made in this section shall revert as
provided by law on June 30, 2026.

(j) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
state auditor shall transfer the funds to the state
retirement system or to individual state agencies as
SF0187

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0774
determined by the department of administration and
information to be necessary to meet the provisions of this
act.

(k) It is the intent of the legislature that the
appropriations made in this section be included in each
state agency's standard budget request for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0187